Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 168E.01, subdivision 8a, is amended to read: Subd. 8a. Fuel products. "Fuel products" means deleted text begin liquefied natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas, as defined in section 296A.01, subdivisions 30 and 31deleted text end new text begin all of the products defined in section 296A.01, subdivisions 13b, 21a, 30, 31, and 42new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for retail deliveries made after July 31, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13b. new text end new text begin Diesel exhaust fluid. new text end new text begin "Diesel exhaust fluid" means a liquid mixture containing 32.5 percent by weight high-purity urea and 67.5 percent by weight deionized water, meeting the specifications of the American Petroleum Institute or International Organization for Standardization, that is used in a selective catalytic reduction system for the purpose of reducing nitrogen oxide emissions from diesel engines. Diesel exhaust fluid is not a motor fuel, gasoline, or special fuel under this chapter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for retail deliveries made after July 31, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21a. new text end new text begin Fuel lubricants. new text end new text begin "Fuel lubricants" means petroleum-based or synthetic products, including but not limited to motor oil, transmission fluid, gear lubricants, and greases, that are sold for use in the operation, maintenance, or performance of motor vehicles or motor fuel dispensing equipment and that are not designed or intended to be combusted in an internal combustion engine. Fuel lubricants are not a motor fuel, gasoline, or special fuel under this chapter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for retail deliveries made after July 31, 2026. new text end